California statutes. Education Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 318, Sec. 2.   Effective August 19, 1998.   See the prevailing Section 8483.9 (added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 320), as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 229, in the Article 22.5 commencing with Section 8482.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.5.

(a) All school-based before and after school programs established pursuant to Section 8481 that are in operation on the date of the enactment of the act adding this section shall elect one of the following options on or before July 1, 1999:

(1) Continuing operation as a schoolage community child care services program pursuant to the remaining operative provisions of Article 22 (commencing with Section 8460).

(2) Operating as an After School Learning and Safe Neighborhoods Partnerships Program pursuant to this article.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that any appropriation for programs established pursuant to Section 8481 be redirected to the appropriation made for programs established pursuant to Article 22 (commencing with Section 8460) or to the appropriation made for programs established pursuant to this article. The State Department of Education shall report the amounts that shall be redirected pursuant to this subdivision to the Department of Finance for approval and adjustment of the budget. The Controller shall adjust the appropriation amounts in accordance with budget revisions approved for this purpose by the Department of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 318, Sec. 2.   Effective August 19, 1998.   See the identical Section 8484.5, as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 320, in the Article 22.5 commencing with Section 8482.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 22.5. After School Learning and Safe Neighborhoods Partnerships Program [8483.3. - 8484.5.]

8483.3.

(a) The State Department of Education shall select applicants to participate in the program established pursuant to this article from among applicants that apply on forms and in a manner prescribed by the department. To the extent possible, the selection of applicants by the State Department of Education shall result in an equitable distribution of grant awards pursuant to Section 8483.7 to applicants in northern, southern, and central California, and in urban, suburban, and rural areas of California.

(b) The State Department of Education shall consider the following in selecting schools to participate in the program established pursuant to this article, with primary emphasis given to items (1) through (4):

(1) Strength of the educational component.

(2) Quality of the educational enrichment component.

(3) Strength of staff training and development component.

(4) Scope and strength of collaboration, including demonstrated support of the schoolsite principal and staff.

(5) Inclusion of a nutritional snack.

(6) Employment of CalWORKs recipients.

(7) Level and type of local matching funds.

(8) Capacity to respond to program evaluation requirements.

(9) Demonstrated fiscal accountability.

(c) The State Department of Education shall develop reporting requirements and allocation procedures, including procedures to reimburse startup costs for programs established pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 319, Sec. 2.   Effective August 19, 1998.   See the prevailing Section 8483.3 (added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 320), as amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 470, in the Article 22.5 commencing with Section 8482.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.9.

(a) A program participant receiving funding pursuant to this article may expend on indirect costs no more than the lesser of the following:

(1) The school district’s indirect cost rate, as approved by the State Department of Education for the appropriate fiscal year.

(2) Five percent of the state program funding received pursuant to this article.

(b) A program participant receiving state funding pursuant to this article may expend no more than 15 percent of that funding on administrative costs. For purposes of this section, administrative costs shall include indirect costs, as described in subdivision (a).

(c) A program participant receiving state funding pursuant to this program shall ensure that no less than 85 percent of that funding is allocated to schoolsites for direct services to pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 319, Sec. 2.   Effective August 19, 1998.   See the prevailing Section 8483.9 (added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 320), as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 229, in the Article 22.5 commencing with Section 8482.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.5.

(a) All school-based before and after school programs established pursuant to Section 8481 that are in operation on the date of the enactment of the act adding this section shall elect one of the following options on or before July 1, 1999:

(1) Continuing operation as a schoolage community child care services program pursuant to the remaining operative provisions of Article 22 (commencing with Section 8460).

(2) Operating as an After School Learning and Safe Neighborhoods Partnerships Program pursuant to this article.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that any appropriation for programs established pursuant to Section 8481 be redirected to the appropriation made for programs established pursuant to Article 22 (commencing with Section 8460) or to the appropriation made for programs established pursuant to this article. The State Department of Education shall report the amounts that shall be redirected pursuant to this subdivision to the Department of Finance for approval and adjustment of the budget. The Controller shall adjust the appropriation amounts in accordance with budget revisions approved for this purpose by the Department of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 319, Sec. 2.   Effective August 19, 1998.   See the identical Section 8484.5, as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 320, in the Article 22.5 commencing with Section 8482.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 22.5. After School Education and Safety Program  [8482. - 8484.65.]

8482.

There is hereby established the After School Education and Safety Program. All references to it by its prior name, the Before and After School Learning and Safe Neighborhoods Partnerships Program, in this article and other state law shall now identify it by its new name. The purpose of this program is to create incentives for establishing locally driven before and after school enrichment programs both during schooldays and summer, intersession, or vacation days that partner public schools and communities to provide academic and literacy support and safe, constructive alternatives for youth. The term public school includes charter schools.

(History: Amended November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 49, Sec. 5.   Note: Prop. 49 is titled the After School Education and Safety Program Act of 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8482.1.

For purposes of this article, Article 19 (commencing with Section 8420), and Article 22.6 (commencing with Section 8484.7), the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Expanded learning” means before school, after school, summer, or intersession learning programs that focus on developing the academic, social, emotional, and physical needs and interests of pupils through hands-on, engaging learning experiences. It is the intent of the Legislature that expanded learning programs are pupil-centered, results driven, include community partners, and complement, but do not replicate, learning activities in the regular schoolday and school year.

(b) “Summer/supplemental grant” means funding to operate any program in excess of 180
 regular schooldays or during any combination of summer, intersession, or vacation periods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 507, Sec. 2.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8482.3.

(a) The After School Education and Safety Program shall be established to serve pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 9, inclusive, at participating public elementary, middle, junior high, and charter schools. The grades to be served by the program at participating schools may be determined by local needs.

(b) A program may operate a before school component of a program, an after school component, or both the before and after school components of a program, on one or multiple schoolsites. If a program operates at multiple schoolsites, only one application shall be required for its establishment.

(c) (1) Each component of a program established pursuant to this article shall
 consist of the following two elements:

(A) An educational and literacy element in which tutoring or homework assistance is provided in one or more of the following areas: language arts, mathematics, history and social science, computer training, or science.

(B) An educational enrichment element that may include, but need not be limited to, fine arts, career technical education, recreation, physical fitness, and prevention activities.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the majority of the time spent by a pupil who is in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 9, inclusive, and who is participating in a career technical education element of a program established pursuant to this article shall be at a site that complies with Section 8484.6.

(d) (1) Applicants shall agree that snacks made available through a program shall conform to the nutrition standards in Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 49430) of Chapter 9 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(2) Applicants shall agree that meals made available through a program shall conform to the nutrition standards of the United States Department of Agriculture’s at-risk afterschool meal component of the Child and Adult Care Food Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1766).

(e) Applicants for programs established pursuant to this article may include any of the following:

(1) A local educational agency, including, but not limited to, a charter school, the California School for the Deaf (northern California), the California School for the Deaf (southern California), and the California
 School for the Blind.

(2) A city, county, or nonprofit organization in partnership with, and with the approval of, a local educational agency or agencies.

(f) Applicants for grants pursuant to this article shall ensure that each of the following requirements is fulfilled, if applicable:

(1) The application documents the commitments of each partner to operate a program on that site or sites.

(2) The application has been approved by the school district, or the charter school governing body, and the principal of each participating school for each schoolsite or other site.

(3) Each partner in the application agrees to share responsibility for the quality of the program.

(4) The application designates the public agency or local educational agency partner to act as the fiscal agent. The fiscal agent may be changed upon approval by the department if the new fiscal agent is a local educational agency or public agency partner. For purposes of this section, “public agency” means only a county board of supervisors or, if the city is incorporated or has a charter, a city council.

(5) Applicants agree to follow all fiscal reporting and auditing standards required by the department.

(6) Applicants agree to incorporate into the program both of the elements required pursuant to subdivision (c).

(7) Applicants agree to provide information to the department for the purpose of program evaluation pursuant to Section 8483.55.

(8) Applicants shall certify that program evaluations will be based upon Section 8484 and upon any requirements recommended by the Advisory Committee on Before and After School Programs and adopted by the state board, in compliance with subdivision (g) of Section 8482.4.

(9) Funds awarded pursuant to this chapter shall not supplant funding used to meet the minimum offer and access requirements of the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program established pursuant to Section 46120. Grantees may, to the extent consistent with the requirements of this chapter, use funds awarded pursuant to this chapter to provide expanded learning services and supports that exceed the minimum requirements of Section 46120, including, but not limited to, serving additional pupils, extending program offerings, or enhancing
 program quality beyond the baseline services required pursuant to Section 46120.

(10) The application states the targeted number of pupils to be served by the program.

(11) Applicants agree to provide the following information on participating pupils to the department:

(A) Schoolday attendance rates.

(B) Program attendance.

(g) (1) Grantees shall review their after school program plans every three years, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Program goals. A grantee may specify any new program goals that will apply to the following three years during the grant renewal process.

(B) Program content, including the elements identified in subdivision (c).

(C) Outcome measures selected from those identified in subdivision (a) of Section 8484 that the grantee will use for the next three years.

(D) Any other information requested by the department.

(E) If the program goals or outcome measures change as a result of this review, the grantee shall notify the department in a manner prescribed by the department.

(F) The grantee shall maintain documentation of the after school program plan for a minimum of five years.

(2) The department shall monitor this review as part of its onsite monitoring process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 12.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 5, 2002, by initiative Prop. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

8482.4.

(a) The department shall review applications submitted under this article and local educational agency audits to determine whether the applicable requirements in subdivision (f) of Section 8482.3 have been fulfilled.

(b) The department shall use the per-pupil formulas established pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8483.7 and the targeted number of pupils to be served, as established pursuant to paragraph (10) of
 subdivision (f) of Section 8482.3, to determine the appropriate grant amount.

(c) (1) A grantee that establishes a program pursuant to this chapter is eligible to receive a three-year renewable grant subject to semiannual reporting. Funding for a grant shall be allocated in annual increments for a period of not more than three years, contingent upon the availability of funds for those grants pursuant to Section 8483.5.

(2) A grantee who receives funds pursuant to this article as part of a partnership or consortium may restructure the partnership or consortium if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) All partners of the partnership or consortium agree to the restructure.

(B) The new consortia or partnership structure, or
 structures, complies with the requirements of subdivision (f) of Section 8482.3, as applicable.

(C) There is no change in the school, or schools, served by the restructured partnership or consortium.

(D) The department approves the restructure.

(d) The department shall notify new grantees of their award status and dollar amount of the award, if any, in writing on or before May 15 of each year in which new grants are awarded.

(e) A first-year grant award shall be made no later than 60 days after enactment of the annual Budget Act and any authorizing legislation. A grant award for the second and subsequent fiscal years shall be made no later than 30 days after enactment of the annual Budget Act and any authorizing legislation.

(f) The department shall allocate 65 percent of the first-year grant amount no later than 30 days after the grantee submits the grant award acceptance letter to the department. Of the remaining 35 percent of the grant, the department shall allocate 25 percent or more of the funds within the operational period of the program and may retain up to 10 percent of the total grant until all administrative requirements of the grant have been met. For the second and subsequent years of the grant, the department shall allocate 65 percent of the annual grant amount for that year no later than 30 days after the annual Budget Act becomes effective. Of the remaining 35 percent of the grant, the department shall allocate 25 percent or more of the funds within the operational period of the program and may retain up to 10 percent of the total grant until all administrative requirements of the grant have been met.

(g) The Advisory Committee on Before and After School Programs shall make recommendations on reporting requirements for program evaluation and review consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 8483.55 to the department on or before June 30, 2007. The department shall review the committee’s recommendations and present them, along with the department’s recommendations, to the state board on or before September 30, 2007. The state board shall adopt requirements for program evaluation and review on or before November 30, 2007.

(h) (1) The department shall provide notice to all schools eligible for grants pursuant to this article regarding the availability of those grants and the application process.

(2) The department shall make the application available through its
 internet website. The department shall determine the dates by which applications will be periodically considered for funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 13.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8482.5.

(a) Priority for funding programs established pursuant to this article shall be given to schools where a minimum of 50 percent of the pupils in elementary schools and 50 percent of the pupils in middle and junior high schools are eligible for free or reduced cost meals through the school lunch program of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(b) Every program established pursuant to this article shall be planned through a collaborative process that includes parents, youth, and representatives of participating public schools, governmental agencies, such as city and county parks and recreation departments, local law enforcement, community organizations, and the private sector.

(History: Amended (as amended by Prop. 49) by Stats. 2006, Ch. 380, Sec. 13.   Effective September 21, 2006.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 5, 2002, by initiative Prop. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

8482.55.

(a) To accomplish the purposes of the After School Education and Safety Program, commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, and for each fiscal year thereafter, all grants made pursuant to this article shall be awarded as set forth in this section.

(b) (1) Grants made to public schools pursuant to this article for the 2005–06 fiscal year shall continue to be funded in each subsequent fiscal year at the 2005–06 fiscal year level, after the adjustments provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 8483.7 and paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 8483.75 have been made, before any
 other grants are funded under this article, provided those schools continue to make application for the grants and are otherwise qualified pursuant to this article. Receipt of a grant at the 2005–06 fiscal year level made pursuant to this subdivision shall not affect a school’s eligibility for additional grant funding as permitted in subdivisions (c) and (d) up to the maximum grants permitted in Sections 8483.7 and 8483.75.

(2) (A) An elementary or middle school program grantee funded pursuant to Section 8484.8 shall apply to receive a new grant under this article in the 2006–07 fiscal year. These programs shall receive priority for funding before any new grant is funded pursuant to this article if the program is otherwise qualified pursuant to this article. Notwithstanding the maximum grant amounts permitted in
 Sections 8483.7 and 8483.75, the grantee shall receive the same amount of grant funding that it was awarded pursuant to Section 8484.8 in the fiscal year before the year for which the grantee
 requests funding pursuant to this article. The grantee shall apply to the department, and elect to receive funding under this article, on or before a date established by the department that is before the date by which the department awards new grants pursuant to this article.

(B) Grantees funded pursuant to Section 8484.8 in the 2005–06 fiscal year may elect to receive funding pursuant to this article after the 2006–07 fiscal year and shall be funded under the conditions outlined in subparagraph (A), if funds are available.

(c) Each public elementary, middle, and junior high school in the state shall be eligible to receive a three-year renewable after school grant for after school programs to be operated during the regular school year, as provided in subparagraph (A) of
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8483.7. In the case of schools serving a combination of elementary, middle, and junior high school pupils, the applicant may apply for a grant with funding based on the middle school grant maximum. The program shall comply with the elementary program and attendance requirements for pupils in the elementary grades. For purposes of this article, a school serving a combination of middle and junior high school and high school pupils shall be eligible to apply for a grant to serve pupils through grade 9. Except as provided in this subdivision, grants for after school programs made pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to all other sections of this article. Grants for after school programs made pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed one hundred twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($112,500) for each regular school year for each elementary school
 or one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for each regular school year for each middle or junior high school. Except as provided in subdivision (f) of this section and subdivision (a) of Section 8482.5, each public elementary, middle, and junior high school in the state shall have equal priority of funding for grants for after school programs made pursuant to this subdivision. Receipt of a grant for an after school program made pursuant to this subdivision shall not affect a school’s eligibility for additional grant funding as permitted in subdivision (d) up to the maximum grants permitted in Sections 8483.7 and 8483.75. Grants made pursuant to this subdivision shall be funded after grants made pursuant to subdivision (b) and before any grants made pursuant to subdivision (d). Grants made pursuant to this subdivision shall be referred to as “After School Education and Safety Universal
 Grants.”

(d) All funds remaining from the appropriation provided in Section 8483.5 after award of grants pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be distributed pursuant to Sections 8483.7 and 8483.75. Grants for programs made pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to all other sections of this article. Priority for grants for programs made pursuant to this subdivision shall be established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8482.5 and Section 8483.3.

(e) With the exception of schools previously funded under both this article and Section 8484.8, a school shall not receive grants in excess of the amounts provided in Sections 8483.7 and 8483.75.

(f) If in any fiscal year the appropriation made pursuant to Section
 8483.5 is insufficient to fund all eligible schools who submit an eligible application for After School Education and Safety Universal Grants pursuant to subdivision (c), priority for After School Education and Safety Universal Grants shall be established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Sections 8482.5 and 8483.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 370, Sec. 12.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 5, 2002, by initiative Prop. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

8482.6.

Every pupil attending a school operating a program pursuant to this article is eligible to participate in the program, subject to program capacity. A program established pursuant to this article may charge family fees. Programs that charge family fees shall waive the cost of these fees for pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price
 meals, for a child that is a homeless youth, as defined by the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a), or for a child who the program knows is in foster care. A program that charges family fees shall schedule fees on a sliding scale that considers family income and ability to pay.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 470, Sec. 8.2) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 5.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8482.6.

(a) Every pupil attending a school operating a program pursuant to this article is eligible to participate in the program, subject to program capacity. A program established pursuant to this article is not required to charge family fees or conduct individual eligibility determinations based on need or income. If a program established pursuant to this article does charge family fees, the program shall not charge a fee to a family for a child if the program knows that the child is a homeless youth, as defined by the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a), or for a child who the program knows is in foster care.

(b) This
 section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 399, Sec. 3.   (AB 1567)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.   See prevailing version added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 470, Sec. 8.2)
-------------------------------------------

8482.8.

(a) (1) If there is a significant barrier to pupil participation in a program established pursuant to this article at the school of attendance, a grantee may request approval from the department to transfer program services to another schoolsite within the same local educational agency. The schoolsite to which the program will be transferred shall satisfy either of the following requirements:

(A) The schoolsite shall agree to receive pupils from, and have an existing grant of the same type as, the transferring school.

(B) The schoolsite shall not have a 10-percent lower percentage of pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals than the transferring school. If the proposed
 schoolsite is not yet open, feeder school free or reduced-price meal data, as determined by the department, shall be considered in evaluating the proposed transfer.

(2) The schoolsite shall not increase the funding at the proposed schoolsite above the maximum after school grant amount established in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8483.7. An applicant that requests approval to transfer program services shall describe the manner in which the applicant intends to provide safe, supervised transportation; ensure communication among teachers in the regular school program, staff in the before school and after school components of the program, and parents of pupils; and coordinate the educational and literacy component of the before and after school components of the program with the regular school programs of participating pupils.

(b) For purposes of this
 article, a significant barrier to pupil participation in the before or after school component of a program established pursuant to this chapter means any of the following:

(1) Fewer than 20 pupils participating in the component of the program.

(2) Extreme transportation constraints, including, but not limited to, desegregation bussing, bussing for magnet or open enrollment schools, or pupil dependence on public transportation.

(3) A local educational agency opens a new schoolsite and either merges an existing schoolsite into the new schoolsite or splits an existing schoolsite’s pupils with the new schoolsite so that the existing schoolsite before or after school component of the program is subject to a grant reduction pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8483.7.

(c) In addition to the authority to transfer funds among school programs pursuant to Sections 8483.7 and 8483.75, and in addition to the flexibility provided by subdivisions (a) and (b), a program grantee that is temporarily prevented from operating a program established pursuant to this article at the program site due to natural disaster, civil unrest, or imminent danger to pupils or staff may shift program funds to the sites of other programs established pursuant to this article to meet attendance targets during that time period.

(d) If a program grantee is temporarily prevented from operating its entire program due to natural disaster, civil unrest, or imminent danger to pupils or staff, the department may approve a request by the grantee for pupil attendance credits equal to the average annual attendance that the grantee would have received if it had been able to operate its
 entire program during that time period.

(e) Upon the request of a program grantee, the department may approve other unforeseen events as qualifying a program grantee to use the authority provided by subdivisions (c) and (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 27.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.

(a) (1) (A) (i) Every after school component of a program established pursuant to this article shall commence immediately upon the conclusion of the regular schoolday, and operate a minimum of 15 hours per week, and at least until 6 p.m. on every regular schoolday.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), a program that operates at a schoolsite located in an area that has a population density of less than 11 persons per square mile may end operating hours not earlier than 5 p.m.

(B) Every after school component of the program shall establish a policy regarding reasonable early daily release of pupils from the program. For those programs or
 schoolsites operating in a community where the early release policy does not meet the unique needs of that community or school, or both, documented evidence may be submitted to the department for an exception and a request for approval of an alternative plan.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that elementary school and middle school or junior high school pupils participate in the full day of the program every day during which pupils participate, except as allowed by the early release policy pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of this section or paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 8483.76.

(3) In order to develop an age-appropriate after school program for pupils in middle school or junior high school, programs established pursuant to this article may implement a flexible attendance schedule for those pupils.

(b) The administrators of a program established pursuant to this article
 may operate during any combination of summer, intersession, or vacation periods for a minimum of three hours per day for the regular school year pursuant to Section 8483.7.

(c) (1) Priority for enrollment of pupils in an after school program shall be as follows:

(A) First priority shall go to pupils who are identified by the program as homeless youth, as defined by the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a), at the time that they apply for enrollment or at any time during the school year, to pupils who are identified by the program as being in foster
 care, and to pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(B) For programs serving middle and junior high school pupils, second priority shall go to pupils who attend daily.

(2) This subdivision does not require a program to verify, or a school district to disclose to an after school program, that a pupil applying for or participating in the program is a homeless
 youth, a foster youth, or eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(3) This subdivision does not require or authorize the disenrollment of a current participant in order to secure the enrollment of a pupil who has priority for enrollment.

(d) A program shall inform the parent or caregiver of a pupil of the right of homeless
 children, foster
 children, and children eligible for free or reduced-price meals to receive priority enrollment and how to request priority enrollment.

(e) For purposes of identifying a pupil who is eligible for priority enrollment pursuant to subdivision (c), the administrators of a program shall allow self-certification of the pupil as a homeless youth, a foster youth, or eligible for free or reduced-price meals. Administrators of a program may also obtain this information through the school district liaison designated for
 homeless children if the school district has a waiver on file allowing for the release of this information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 6.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.1.

(a) (1) Every before school program component established pursuant to this article shall in no instance operate for less than one and one-half hours per regular schoolday. Every program shall establish a policy regarding reasonable late daily arrival of pupils to the program.

(2) (A) It is the intent of the Legislature that elementary school and middle school or junior high school pupils participate in the full day of the program every day during which pupils participate, except when arriving late in accordance with the late arrival policy described in paragraph (1) or as reasonably necessary.

(B) A pupil who attends less than one-half of the daily
 program hours shall not be counted for
 purposes of attendance.

(3) In order to develop an age-appropriate before school program for pupils in middle school or junior high school, programs established pursuant to this article may implement a flexible attendance schedule for those pupils.

(b) The administrators of a before school program established pursuant to this article may operate during any combination of summer, intersession, or vacation periods for a minimum of two hours per day for the regular school year pursuant to Section 8483.75.

(c) Every before school program component established pursuant to this
 article shall offer a breakfast meal
 described in Section 49553 for all program participants.

(d) (1) Priority for enrollment of pupils in a before school program shall be as follows:

(A) First priority shall go to pupils who are identified by the program as homeless youth, as defined by the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a), at the time that they apply for enrollment or at any time during the school year,
 to pupils who are identified by the program as being in foster care, and to pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(B) For programs serving middle and junior high school pupils, second priority shall go to pupils who attend daily.

(2) This subdivision
 does not require a program to verify, or a school district to disclose to a before school program, that a pupil applying for or participating in the program is a homeless youth, foster youth, or eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(3) This subdivision
 does not require or authorize the disenrollment of a current participant in order to secure the enrollment of a pupil who has priority for enrollment.

(e) A program shall inform the parent or caregiver of a pupil of the right of homeless
 children, foster children, and children eligible for free or reduced-price meals to receive priority enrollment and how to request priority enrollment.

(f) For purposes of identifying a pupil who is eligible for priority enrollment pursuant to subdivision (d), the administrators of a program shall allow self-certification of the pupil as a homeless youth, a foster
 youth, or eligible for free or reduced-price meals. Administrators of a program may also obtain this information through the school district liaison designated for homeless children if the school district has a waiver on file allowing for the release of this information.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 470, Sec. 11.2) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 7.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.1.

(a) (1) Every before school program component established pursuant to this article shall in no instance operate for less than one and one-half hours per regular schoolday. Every program shall establish a policy regarding reasonable late daily arrival of pupils to the program.

(2) (A) It is the intent of the Legislature that elementary school pupils participate in the full day of the program every day during which pupils participate and that pupils in middle school or junior high school attend a minimum of six hours a week or three days a week to accomplish program goals, except when arriving late in accordance with the late
 arrival policy described in paragraph (1) or as reasonably necessary.

(B) A pupil who attends less than one-half of the daily program hours shall not be counted for the purposes of attendance.

(3) In order to develop an age-appropriate before school program for pupils in middle school or junior high school, programs established pursuant to this article may implement a flexible attendance schedule for those pupils.

(b) The administrators of a before school program established pursuant to this article shall have the option of operating during any combination of summer, intersession, or vacation periods for a minimum of two hours per day for the regular school year pursuant to Section 8483.75.

(c) Every before school program component established pursuant to this article shall offer a breakfast meal as described by Section 49553 for all program participants.

(d) (1) Priority for enrollment of pupils in a before school program shall be as follows:

(A) First priority shall go to pupils who are identified by the program as homeless youth, as defined by the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a), at the time that they apply for enrollment or at any time during the school year, and to pupils who are identified by the program as being in foster care.

(B) For programs serving middle and junior high
 school pupils, second priority shall go to pupils who attend daily.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require a program to verify, or a school district to disclose to a before school program, that a pupil applying for or participating in the program is a homeless youth or foster youth.

(3) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require or authorize the disenrollment of a current participant in order to secure the enrollment of a pupil who has priority for enrollment.

(e) A program shall inform the parent or caregiver of a pupil of the right of homeless children and foster children to receive priority enrollment and how to request priority enrollment.

(f) For purposes of identifying a pupil who is eligible for priority enrollment pursuant to subdivision (d), the administrators of a program shall allow self-certification of the pupil as a homeless youth or a foster youth. Administrators of a program may also obtain this information through the school district liaison designated for homeless children if the school district has a waiver on file allowing for the release of this information.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.
